Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5906.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 731. (1) Except as otherwise provided in section 737 or section 10 of the Stille-DeRossett-Hale single state construction code act, 1972 PA 230, MCL 125.1510, only an individual who is licensed under this article shall install electrical wiring. In a municipality where inspection service is provided, a person shall obtain a permit from the board or municipality that has jurisdiction. (2) If electrical wiring is installed without compensation by a person that is licensed under this article for or on behalf of a charitable organization, the owner of the property on which the work is performed may obtain the permit required under subsection (1). However, the charitable organization exception under this subsection applies only to the reconstruction, renovation, or remodeling of 1- to 4-family dwellings. (3) Except as otherwise provided in section 737, a person shall not erect, install, alter, repair, service, or maintain fire alarm system wiring, devices, appliances, or equipment in a building or structure without a license. (4) Except as otherwise provided in section 737, a person shall not install, connect, repair, or maintain electric signs and related wiring without a license. (5) Notwithstanding any other provisions of this article and after a proper application is submitted and the appropriate fees paid, the board and department shall issue a license without examination to an individual seeking sign specialty licensure if he or she the individual is licensed, registered, or otherwise regulated in another state and the board determines that the standards in the other state meet or exceed the standards imposed in this article. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless House Bill No. 5905 (request no. H06047'26) of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.